Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 5 Construction, Improvement, and Repair of Rail Lines, Depots, and Roads

Cross references.

Requirement that railroad companies pave street crossed by its tracks and pay for other street and utility improvements, §§

36-39-6

,

36-39-7

.

46-8-120.
Powers of railroad companies generally.

Any railroad company owning or operating a railroad in this state, whether such company is chartered under the laws of this state or under the laws of any other state, is authorized and empowered:

To reconstruct its lines or tracks, to build one or more additional main tracks, to relocate any line or portions of a line, and to build, as a substitute for trestles, embankments upon which tracks may be laid or to widen cuts where necessary for proper construction or maintenance;

For obtaining gravel and other material, to take as much land as may be necessary for the purpose of construction, operation, and maintenance of such road;

To cut any trees that may be in any danger of falling on the tracks or obstructing the right of way, making compensation therefor as provided by law;

To build and maintain such additional depots, tracks, and terminal facilities as may be necessary for the proper accommodation of the business of the company; and

To construct, maintain, and operate tracks for the purpose of connecting two or more lines of railroad operated by the same company not more than ten miles apart.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this Code section, no railroad company shall be authorized so to change the location of an existing line as to leave off of the line of railroad to be operated by it any of the passenger or freight stations now existing under the same without the express approval of the commission.

History.

Ga. L. 1914, p. 144, § 1; Code 1933, § 94-321; Ga. L. 1957, p. 403, § 1.

46-8-121.
Acquisition of property by companies; approval by commission as prerequisite to exercise of power of eminent domain.

Authority and power are granted to railroad companies to acquire by purchase or gift and to hold such real estate as may be necessary for all of the purposes mentioned in Code Section 46-8-120. If the real estate cannot be acquired by purchase or gift, then it may be acquired by condemnation in the manner provided in Title 22, provided that the right of condemnation under this Code section shall not be exercised until the commission, under such rules of procedure as it may provide, first approves the taking of the property.

History.

Ga. L. 1914, p. 144, §§ 1, 2; Code 1933, §§ 94-321, 94-322.

46-8-122.
Effect of Code Sections 46-8-120 and 46-8-121 on other powers and authority granted to railroad companies.

The powers and authority conferred by Code Sections 46-8-120 and 46-8-121 are in addition to the powers and authority which railroad companies may have by virtue of their charters or by virtue of the general laws of this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1914, p. 144, § 3; Code 1933, § 94-323.

46-8-123.
Construction of extensions and branch roads generally.

Any railroad company may extend its railroad from any point named in the petition for charter or may build branch roads from any point on its line of road. Before making any such extensions or building any such branch roads, the company shall, by resolution of its board of directors, to be entered in the records of its proceedings, designate the route of such proposed extension or branch and advertise the route in all of the counties through which such extension or branch road will run, for the time and in the manner provided by Code Section 46-8-41, and shall file a certified copy of such resolution and advertisements in the office of the Secretary of State, which shall be filed and recorded as are original petitions for charters. As a fee for such filing, the company shall pay to the Office of the State Treasurer $25.00 for each extension or branch road.

Within one year after the filing of the resolution with the Secretary of State, the railroad company shall have the right to begin the construction and equipment of such branch or extension. If the railroad company fails to construct as much as 20 miles within two years, or fails to complete the branch or extension if it is to be less than 20 miles in length, the powers and privileges to do so shall cease.

For the purpose of such extension or branch road, the company shall have all the rights and privileges of condemning or acquiring the rights of way that are provided for constructing and building the main line.

All the provisions of this title relating to the issuance of stocks and bonds for the road authorized under the original petition for incorporation shall be applicable to and control the issuance of stocks and bonds for the proposed extensions and branches.

History.

Ga. L. 1892, p. 37, § 10; Civil Code 1895, § 2169; Civil Code 1910, § 2587; Code 1933, § 94-307; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 2/SB 296.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “Office of the State Treasurer” for “Office of Treasury and Fiscal Services” in the middle of the last sentence of subsection (a).

46-8-124.
Exercise of power of eminent domain by railroad corporations generally.

In the event a railroad company does not procure, by contract, lease, or purchase, the title to the lands, rights of way, or other property necessary for the construction or connection of the railroad and of such branches and extensions as are necessary or proper for the company to reach its freight or passenger depot in any city in this state or as are necessary to reach its wharves, docks, or other necessary terminal facilities, the company may construct its railroad over any lands, any rights of way, or the tracks of other railroads upon paying or tendering to the owner thereof, or to the legally authorized representative of such owner, just and reasonable compensation for said lands or said right of way. If the compensation cannot be agreed upon, it shall be assessed and determined in the manner provided in Title 22.

History.

Ga. L. 1892, p. 37, § 11; Ga. L. 1895, p. 95, §§ 2, 3; Civil Code 1895, § 2170; Civil Code 1910, § 2588; Code 1933, § 94-308.

46-8-125.
[Reserved] Change of general direction and route of railroad.

History.

Ga. L. 1892, p. 37, § 12; Civil Code 1895, § 2171; Ga. L. 1903, p. 36, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 2589; Code 1933, § 94-309; Ga. L. 2004, p. 631, § 46; repealed by Ga. L. 2006, p. 699, § 3/SB 285, effective July 1, 2006.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 699, § 3/SB 285 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2006.

46-8-126.
Relocation of highways necessitated by construction of crossings.

In all cases where a railroad crosses a highway and the cutting makes a change in the route of any such highway or a change is desirable with a view to easier ascent or descent, the railroad company may take such additional lands for the construction of such highway upon a new route as may be deemed necessary by the directors. In taking property under this Code section, the railroad company shall proceed in the manner provided in Title 22 for condemning rights of way and other property.

History.

Ga. L. 1892, p. 37, § 12; Civil Code 1895, § 2172; Civil Code 1910, § 2590; Code 1933, § 94-310.

Cross references.

Railroad grade crossings generally, §

32-6-190

et seq.

46-8-127.
[Reserved] Regulation of distance between tracks with the same terminal points.

History.

Ga. L. 1892, p. 37, § 15; Ga. L. 1895, p. 60, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 2176; Civil Code 1910, § 2594; Code 1933, § 94-315; repealed by Ga. L. 2006, p. 699, § 3/SB 285, effective July 1, 2006.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 699, § 3/SB 285 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2006.

46-8-128.
[Reserved] Obstructions located at crossing; disrepair of crossing; removal of obstruction or repair of crossing by county upon failure of company to remove obstruction or repair crossing.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 37, § 1; Civil Code 1895, §§ 2227, 2228, 2229, 2230, 2231; Civil Code 1910, §§ 2680, 2681, 2682, 2683, 2684; Code 1933, §§ 94-512, 94-513, 94-514, 94-515, 94-516; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 46; repealed by Ga. L. 2002, p. 1050, § 7, effective July 1, 2002.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2002, p. 1050, § 7 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2002.

46-8-129 through 46-8-132.
[Reserved]

History.

Ga. L. 1889, p. 158, §§ 1-3; Civil Code 1895, §§ 2243-2246; Civil Code 1910, §§ 2699-2702; Code 1933, §§ 94-601 — 94-604; repealed by Ga. L. 2006, p. 699, § 3/SB 285, effective July 1, 2006.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 699, § 3/SB 285 repealed and reserved these Code sections, effective July 1, 2006.

46-8-133.
Alteration of railroad tracks, bridges, and other structures to accommodate motor vehicles.

No railroad, railroad company, railway company, or person, firm, or corporation operating any line of railway in this state shall be required by the commission, or otherwise, to alter its tracks at any underpass, railroad trestle, or bridge; to alter the grade of any public road or highway at any such underpass, railroad trestle, or bridge; or to otherwise relay or reconstruct any portion of its tracks, or other structures, or any portion of any public road or highway, in order to accommodate any motor vehicle exceeding 12 feet six inches in height.

History.

Ga. L. 1941, p. 449, § 10.

Cross references.

Railroad grade crossings generally, §

32-6-190

et seq.